test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_31si_uusi_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Jok.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct.


  Noun - uusi - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'ny' - ei tsekattu
     uusi+A+Sg+Nom: uusi
     uusi+A+Sg+Gen: uuen
     uusi+A+Sg+Par: uutta
     uusi+A+Sg+Tra: uueksi
     uusi+A+Sg+Abe: uuetta
     uusi+A+Sg+Ine: uuessa
     uusi+A+Sg+Ela: uuesta
     uusi+A+Sg+Ill: uutheen
     uusi+A+Sg+Ade: uuela
     uusi+A+Sg+Abl: uuelta
     uusi+A+Sg+All: [uuele, uuelet]
     uusi+A+Sg+Ess: uutena
     uusi+A+Pl+Nom: uuet
     uusi+A+Pl+Gen: uusitten
     uusi+A+Pl+Par: uusia
     uusi+A+Pl+Tra: uusiksi
     uusi+A+Pl+Abe: uusitta
     uusi+A+Pl+Ine: uusissa
     uusi+A+Pl+Ela: uusista
     uusi+A+Pl+Ill: uushiin
     uusi+A+Pl+Ade: uusila
     uusi+A+Pl+Abl: uusilta
     uusi+A+Pl+All: [uusile, uusilet]
     uusi+A+Pl+Ess: uusina
     uusi+A+Pl+Com: uusine

     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Nom: uuempi
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Gen: uueman
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Par: uuemppaa
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Tra: uuemaksi
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Abe: uuematta
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Ine: uuemassa
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Ela: uuemasta
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Ill: uuemphaan
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Ade: uuemalla
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Abl: uuemalta
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+All: [uuemalle, uuemallet]
     uusi+A+Sg+Compar+Ess: uuempanna
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Nom: uuemat
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Gen: uuemitten
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Par: uuempia
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Tra: uuemiksi
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Abe: uuemitta
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Ine: uuemissa
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Ela: uuemista
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Ill: uuemphiin
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Ade: uuemilla
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Abl: uuemilta
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+All: [uuemille, uuemillet]
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Ess: uuempinna
     uusi+A+Pl+Compar+Com: uuempinne

     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: uusiin
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: uusiiman
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Par: uusiinta
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: uusiimaksi
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: uusiimatta
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: uusiimassa
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: uusiimasta
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: uusiimphaan
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: uusiimalla
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: uusiimalta
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+All: [uusiimalle, uusiimallet]
     uusi+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: uusiimpanna
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: uusiimat
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: uusiimitten
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Par: uusiimpia
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: uusiimiksi
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: uusiimitta
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: uusiimissa
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: uusiimista
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: uusiimphiin
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: uusiimilla
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: uusiimilta
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+All: [uusiimille, uusiimillet]
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: uusiimpinna
     uusi+A+Pl+Superl+Com: uusiimpinne
